Washington statutes.
RCW 15.30.250

Penalties for violating chapter.

(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, any person violating the provisions of this chapter or rules adopted hereunder is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(2) A second or subsequent violation is a gross misdemeanor. Any offense committed more than five years after a previous conviction shall be considered a first offense.

[ 2003 c 53 s 106; 1961 c 29 s 25.]

NOTES:

Intent—Effective date—2003 c 53: See notes following RCW 2.48.180.